Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1095YH (6) 91 th/ns H.F. 73 Section 1. Section 321I.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. Off-road motorcycles shall be considered all-terrain 3 vehicles for the purpose of registration. Off-road motorcycles 4 shall also be considered all-terrain vehicles for the purpose 5 of titling if a title has not previously been issued pursuant 6 to chapter 321 . An operator of an off-road motorcycle is 7 subject to provisions governing the operation of all-terrain 8 vehicles in this chapter , but is exempt from the education 9 instruction and certification program requirements of sections 10 321I.25 and 321I.26 . 11 Sec. 2. Section 321I.1, subsection 11, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 11. âEducation certificateâ means an all-terrain vehicle 14 education certificate, approved by the commission, which is 15 issued to a qualified applicant who is twelve years of age or 16 older . 17 Sec. 3. Section 321I.1, subsection 17, paragraph b, Code 18 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 b. The operator of an off-road utility vehicle is subject 20 to provisions governing the operation of all-terrain vehicles 21 in section 321.234A , this chapter , and administrative rules , 22 but is exempt from the education instruction and certification 23 program requirements of sections 321I.25 and 321I.26 . An 24 operator of an off-road utility vehicle shall not operate the 25 vehicle on a designated riding area or designated riding trail 26 unless the department has posted signage indicating the riding 27 area or trail is open to the operation of off-road utility 28 vehicles. Off-road utility vehicles are subject to the dealer 29 registration and titling requirements of this chapter . A 30 motorized vehicle that was previously titled or is currently 31 titled under chapter 321 shall not be registered or operated 32 as an off-road utility vehicle. 33 Sec. 4. Section 321I.25, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 34 to read as follows: 35 -1- LSB 1095YH (6) 91 th/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 73 3. Upon completion of the course of instruction, the 1 commission shall provide for the administration of either a 2 written test or the demonstration of adequate riding skills to 3 any student who wishes to qualify for an education certificate. 4 Sec. 5. Section 321I.26, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2025, are 5 amended to read as follows: 6 1. A person twelve years of age or older but less than 7 eighteen years of age shall not operate an all-terrain vehicle , 8 off-road utility vehicle, or off-road motorcycle on public 9 land, public ice, a designated riding trail, or land purchased 10 with all-terrain vehicle registration funds in this state 11 without obtaining a valid education certificate approved by 12 the department and having the certificate in the personâs 13 possession. This subsection does not apply if the operation 14 is part of a prescribed education training course and the 15 operation is under the direct supervision of a certified 16 all-terrain vehicle education instructor. 17 3. Any person who is required to have an education 18 certificate under this chapter and who has completed a course 19 of instruction established under section 321I.2, subsection 20 1 , paragraph âiâ , including the successful passage of an 21 examination which includes either a written test relating to 22 such course of instruction or the demonstration of adequate 23 riding skills , shall be considered qualified to receive an 24 education certificate. 25